Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6180YH (2) 91 nls/ko H.F. 2273 Section 1. Section 507E.8, subsection 1, paragraphs a and b, 1 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. For purposes of an arrest resulting from a criminal 3 violation of any provision of the Code subject to the 4 jurisdiction of the commissioner established as a result of an 5 investigation pursuant to this chapter or chapter 502 , 502A , 6 507A , 522C, 522F, 523A , 523C , 523D , or 523I . 7 b. While conducting an investigation or engaged in an 8 assignment authorized by this chapter or chapter 502 , 502A , 9 507A , 522C, 522F, 523A , 523C , 523D , or 523I . 10